District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Pretrial Detention Reporting Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 1505 of the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council for the District of
Columbia Establishment Act of 2001, effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official
Code § 22-4234), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b-9) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “no later than 180
days after the applicability date of section 30(f), (g), and (h) of the Secure DC Omnibus
Amendment Act of 2024, passed on 2nd reading on March 5, 2024 (Enrolled version of Bill 24-
345) (“Secure DC Omnibus”)” and inserting the phrase “no later than September 30, 2026” in its
place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the effective date of
the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date of the Prioritizing
Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC Omnibus” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the effective date of
the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date of the Prioritizing
Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC Omnibus” in its place.
(4) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the effective date of
the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date of the Prioritizing
Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC Omnibus” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b-10) is amended as follows:
(1) The lead-in language is amended by striking the phrase “for juveniles” and
inserting the phrase “for juveniles, no later than September 30, 2026” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the applicability
date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “after the effective date
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC
Omnibus” in its place.
(3) Paragraph (3) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the applicability
date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “after the effective date
of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC
Omnibus” in its place.
(4) Paragraph (4) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the applicability
date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date
of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC
Omnibus” in its place.
(5) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the applicability
date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date
of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC
Omnibus” in its place.
(6) Paragraph (6) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the applicability
date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date
of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC
Omnibus” in its place.
(7) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “and after the applicability
date of section 28 of the Secure DC Omnibus” and inserting the phrase “, after the effective date
of the Prioritizing Public Safety Emergency, and after the effective date of the Secure DC
Omnibus” in its place.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of January 1, 2025.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 60-day period of congressional
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3